Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 214.10, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Proceedings. A board shall initiate proceedings to suspend or revoke a license or shall refuse to renew a license of a person licensed by the board who is convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction of violating sectionnew text begin 256.98,new text end 609.2231, subdivision 8, 609.23, 609.231, 609.2325, 609.233, 609.2335, 609.234, 609.465, 609.466,new text begin 609.496, 609.497,new text end 609.52, new text begin 609.542, new text end or 609.72, subdivision 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end